Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 46. CONGENITAL CYTOMEGALOVIRUS

Sec. 46.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "congenital cytomegalovirus" means cytomegalovirus acquired by an infant before birth.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (S.B. 791), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 46.002. EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS ON CONGENITAL CYTOMEGALOVIRUS. (a) The department, in consultation with the Texas Medical Board, shall develop and publish informational materials for women who may become pregnant, expectant parents, and parents of infants regarding:

(1) the incidence of cytomegalovirus;

(2) the transmission of cytomegalovirus to pregnant women and women who may become pregnant;

(3) birth defects caused by congenital cytomegalovirus;

(4) available preventive measures to avoid the infection of women who are pregnant or may become pregnant; and

(5) resources available for families of children born with congenital cytomegalovirus.

(b) The materials must be published in:

(1) English and Spanish;

(2) an easily comprehensible form; and

(3) a typeface large enough to be clearly legible.

(c) The department shall periodically review the materials to determine if changes to the contents of the materials are necessary.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (S.B. 791), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 46.003. PUBLICATION OF MATERIALS. (a) The department shall publish the information required to be published under this chapter on the department's Internet website.

(b) The department may not charge a fee for physical copies of the materials. The department shall provide appropriate quantities of the materials to any person on request.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (S.B. 791), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 46.004. EDUCATION AND OUTREACH. (a) The department shall establish an outreach program to:

(1) educate women who may become pregnant, expectant parents, and parents of infants about cytomegalovirus; and

(2) raise awareness of cytomegalovirus among health care providers who provide care to expectant mothers or infants.

(b) The department may solicit and accept the assistance of any relevant medical associations or community resources, including faith-based resources, to promote education about cytomegalovirus under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (S.B. 791), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 46.005. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules for the implementation of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (S.B. 791), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.